si_LK.aff
FLAG num
SFX 230 Y 341 
SFX 230 0 යනවා .
SFX 230 0 යමි .
SFX 230 0 යන්නෙමි .
SFX 230 0 යමු .
SFX 230 0 යන්නෙමු .
SFX 230 0 යහි .
SFX 230 0 යන්නෙහි .
SFX 230 0 යහු .
SFX 230 0 යන්නෙහු .
SFX 230 0 යන්නේය .
SFX 230 0 යන්නීය .
SFX 230 0 යන්නාය .
SFX 230 0 යති .
SFX 230 0 යන්නෝය .
SFX 230 0 යන්න .
SFX 230 0 යව .
SFX 230 0 යනු .
SFX 230 0 යපිය .
SFX 230 0 යාපිය .
SFX 230 0 යපන් .
SFX 230 0 යාපන් .
SFX 230 0 යව් .
SFX 230 0 යපියව් .
SFX 230 0 යාපියව් .
SFX 230 0 යපල්ලා .
SFX 230 0 යාපල්ලා .
SFX 230 0 යනවාලා .
SFX 230 0 යයිලු .
SFX 230 0 යන්නේලු .
SFX 230 0 යතිලු .
SFX 230 0 යන්නෝලු .
SFX 230 0 යද්දෙන් .
SFX 230 0 යපුවාවේ .
SFX 230 0 යාපුවාවේ .
SFX 230 0 යපුදෙන් .
SFX 230 0 යාපුදෙන් .
SFX 230 0 යාවි .
SFX 230 0 යේවි .
SFX 230 0 යන .
SFX 230 0 යනා .
SFX 230 0 යවන .
SFX 230 0 යවනා .
SFX 230 0 යවපු .
SFX 230 0 යවා .
SFX 230 0 යවලා .
SFX 230 0 යමින් .
SFX 230 0 යවමින් .
SFX 230 0 යත්ම .
SFX 230 0 යවත්ම .
SFX 230 0 යන්න .
SFX 230 0 යන්නට .
SFX 230 0 යන්ට .
SFX 230 0 යවන්න .
SFX 230 0 යවන්නට .
SFX 230 0 යද්දී .
SFX 230 0 යත්දී .
SFX 230 0 යවද්දී .
SFX 230 0 යවත්දී .
SFX 230 0 යතොත් .
SFX 230 0 යවතොත් .
SFX 230 0 යතත් .
SFX 230 0 යවතත් .
SFX 230 0 ගියා  .
SFX 230 0 ගියෙමි  .
SFX 230 0 ගියෙමු  . 
SFX 230 0 ගියෙහි  .
SFX 230 0 ගියෙහු  . 
SFX 230 0 ගියේය  .
SFX 230 0 ගියාය  .
SFX 230 0 ගියහ  .
SFX 230 0 ගියෝය  .
SFX 230 0 ගියාලු  .
SFX 230 0 ගියේලු  .
SFX 230 0 ගියහලු  .
SFX 230 0 ගියෝලු  .
SFX 230 0 ගියාවේ  .
SFX 230 0 ගියදෙන්  .
SFX 230 0 ගියාදෙන්  .
SFX 230 0 ගියපුදෙන්  .  
SFX 230 0 යැවෙනවා .
SFX 230 0 යැවෙමි .
SFX 230 0 යැවෙන්නෙමි .
SFX 230 0 යැවෙමු .
SFX 230 0 යැවෙන්නෙමු .
SFX 230 0 යැවෙහි .
SFX 230 0 යැවෙන්නෙහි .
SFX 230 0 යැවෙහු .
SFX 230 0 යැවෙන්නෙහු .
SFX 230 0 යැවෙන්නේය .
SFX 230 0 යැවෙන්නීය .
SFX 230 0 යැවෙන්නාය .
SFX 230 0 යැවෙති .
SFX 230 0 යැවෙන්නෝය .
SFX 230 0 යැවෙන්න .
SFX 230 0 යැවෙව .
SFX 230 0 යැවෙනු .
SFX 230 0 යැවෙපිය .
SFX 230 0 යැවොපිය .
SFX 230 0 යැවෙපන් .
SFX 230 0 යැවොපන් .
SFX 230 0 යැවෙව් .
SFX 230 0 යැවෙපියව් .
SFX 230 0 යැවොපියව් .
SFX 230 0 යැවෙපල්ලා .
SFX 230 0 යැවොපල්ලා .
SFX 230 0 යැවෙනවාලා .
SFX 230 0 යැවෙයිලු .
SFX 230 0 යැවෙන්නේලු .
SFX 230 0 යැවෙතිලු .
SFX 230 0 යැවෙන්නෝලු .
SFX 230 0 යැවෙද්දෙන් .
SFX 230 0 යැවෙපුවාවේ .
SFX 230 0 යැවොපුවාවේ .
SFX 230 0 යැවෙපුදෙන් .
SFX 230 0 යැවොපුදෙන් .
SFX 230 0 යැවොවි .
SFX 230 0 යැවේවි .
SFX 230 0 යැවෙන .
SFX 230 0 යැවෙනා .
SFX 230 0 යැවවෙන .
SFX 230 0 යැවවෙනා .
SFX 230 0 යැවූ .
SFX 230 0 යැවුණ .
SFX 230 0 යැවුණු .
SFX 230 0 යැවිච්ච .
SFX 230 0 යැවවූ .
SFX 230 0 යැවෙව්ව .
SFX 230 0 යැවවුණු .
SFX 230 0 යැවවෙව්ව .
SFX 230 0 යැවී .
SFX 230 0 යැවිලා .
SFX 230 0 යැවවී .
SFX 230 0 යැවවිලා .
SFX 230 0 යැවෙමින් .
SFX 230 0 යැවවෙමින් .
SFX 230 0 යැවෙත්ම .
SFX 230 0 යැවවෙත්ම .
SFX 230 0 යැවෙන්න .
SFX 230 0 යැවෙන්ට .
SFX 230 0 යැවෙන්නට .
SFX 230 0 යැවීමට .	
SFX 230 0 යැවවෙන්න  .
SFX 230 0 යැවවෙන්ට  .
SFX 230 0 යැවවෙන්නට  .
SFX 230 0 යැවවීමට .	
SFX 230 0 යැවිය .
SFX 230 0 යැවවිය .
SFX 230 0 යැවෙද්දී .
SFX 230 0 යැවෙත්දී .
SFX 230 0 යැවවෙද්දී .
SFX 230 0 යැවවෙත්දී .
SFX 230 0 යැවුවොත් .
SFX 230 0 යැවුවොතින් .
SFX 230 0 යැවෙතොත් .
SFX 230 0 යැවුණොත් .
SFX 230 0 යැවුණොතින් .
SFX 230 0 යැවෙව්වොත් .
SFX 230 0 යැවෙව්වොතින් .
SFX 230 0 යැවවෙතොත් .
SFX 230 0 යැවවුණොත් .
SFX 230 0 යැවවුණොතින් .
SFX 230 0 යැවුවත් .
SFX 230 0 යැවෙතත් .
SFX 230 0 යැවුණත් .
SFX 230 0 යැවෙව්වත් .
SFX 230 0 යැවවෙතත් .
SFX 230 0 යැවවුණත් .
SFX 230 0 යැවුණා .
SFX 230 0 යැවුණෙමි .
SFX 230 0 යැවුණෙමු .
SFX 230 0 යැවුණෙහි .
SFX 230 0 යැවුණෙහු .
SFX 230 0 යැවුණේය .
SFX 230 0 යැවිණ .
SFX 230 0 යැවිණි .
SFX 230 0 යැවුණි .
SFX 230 0 යැවීය . 
SFX 230 0 යැවුණාය .
SFX 230 0 යැවුණෝය .
SFX 230 0 යැවුණහ .
SFX 230 0 යැවියහ .
SFX 230 0 යැවුණාලු .
SFX 230 0 යැවුණේලු .
SFX 230 0 යැවුණහලු .
SFX 230 0 යැවුණෝලු .
SFX 230 0 යැවුණාවේ .
SFX 230 0 යැවුණදෙන් .
SFX 230 0 යැවුනා .
SFX 230 0 යැවුනෙමි .
SFX 230 0 යැවුනෙමු .
SFX 230 0 යැවුනෙහි .
SFX 230 0 යැවුනෙහු .
SFX 230 0 යැවුනේය .
SFX 230 0 යැවින .
SFX 230 0 යැවිනි .
SFX 230 0 යැවුනි .
SFX 230 0 යැවුනාය .
SFX 230 0 යැවුනහ .
SFX 230 0 යැවුනෝය .
SFX 230 0 යැවුනාලු .
SFX 230 0 යැවුනේලු .
SFX 230 0 යැවුනහලු .
SFX 230 0 යැවුනෝලු .
SFX 230 0 යැවුනාවේ .
SFX 230 0 යැවුනදෙන් .
SFX 230 0 යවනවා .
SFX 230 0 යවමි .
SFX 230 0 යවන්නෙමි .
SFX 230 0 යවමු .
SFX 230 0 යවන්නෙමු .
SFX 230 0 යවහි .
SFX 230 0 යවන්නෙහි .
SFX 230 0 යවහු .
SFX 230 0 යවන්නෙහු .
SFX 230 0 යවන්නේය .
SFX 230 0 යවන්නීය .
SFX 230 0 යවන්නාය .
SFX 230 0 යවති .
SFX 230 0 යවන්නෝය .
SFX 230 0 යවන්න .
SFX 230 0 යවව .
SFX 230 0 යවනු .
SFX 230 0 යවපිය .
SFX 230 0 යවාපිය .
SFX 230 0 යවපන් .
SFX 230 0 යවාපන් .
SFX 230 0 යවව් .
SFX 230 0 යවපියව් .
SFX 230 0 යවාපියව් .
SFX 230 0 යවපල්ලා .
SFX 230 0 යවාපල්ලා .
SFX 230 0 යවනවාලා .
SFX 230 0 යවයිලු .
SFX 230 0 යවන්නේලු .
SFX 230 0 යවතිලු .
SFX 230 0 යවන්නෝලු .
SFX 230 0 යවද්දෙන් .
SFX 230 0 යවපුවාවේ .
SFX 230 0 යවාපුවාවේ .
SFX 230 0 යවපුදෙන් .
SFX 230 0 යවාපුදෙන් .
SFX 230 0 යවාවි .
SFX 230 0 යවේවි .
SFX 230 0 යැව්වා .
SFX 230 0 යැව්වෙමි .
SFX 230 0 යැව්වෙමු .
SFX 230 0 යැව්වෙහි .
SFX 230 0 යැව්වෙහු .
SFX 230 0 යැව්වේය .
SFX 230 0 යැව්වාය .
SFX 230 0 යැව්හ .
SFX 230 0 යැව්වහ .
SFX 230 0 යැව්වෝය .
SFX 230 0 යැව්වාලු .
SFX 230 0 යැව්වේලු .
SFX 230 0 යැව්හලු .
SFX 230 0 යැව්වහලු .
SFX 230 0 යැව්වෝලු .
SFX 230 0 යැව්වාවේ .
SFX 230 0 යැව්වදෙන් .
SFX 230 0 යැවවෙනවා .
SFX 230 0 යැවවෙමි .
SFX 230 0 යැවවෙන්නෙමි .
SFX 230 0 යැවවෙමු .
SFX 230 0 යැවවෙන්නෙමු .
SFX 230 0 යැවවෙහි .
SFX 230 0 යැවවෙන්නෙහි .
SFX 230 0 යැවවෙහු .
SFX 230 0 යැවවෙන්නෙහු .
SFX 230 0 යැවවෙන්නේය .
SFX 230 0 යැවවෙන්නීය .
SFX 230 0 යැවවෙන්නාය .
SFX 230 0 යැවවෙති .
SFX 230 0 යැවවෙන්නෝය .
SFX 230 0 යැවවෙන්න .
SFX 230 0 යැවවෙව .
SFX 230 0 යැවවෙනු .
SFX 230 0 යැවවෙපිය .
SFX 230 0 යැවවොපිය .
SFX 230 0 යැවවෙපන් .
SFX 230 0 යැවවොපන් .
SFX 230 0 යැවවෙව් .
SFX 230 0 යැවවෙපියව් .
SFX 230 0 යැවවොපියව් .
SFX 230 0 යැවවෙපල්ලා .
SFX 230 0 යැවවොපල්ලා .
SFX 230 0 යැවවෙනවාලා .
SFX 230 0 යැවවෙයිලු .
SFX 230 0 යැවවෙන්නේලු .
SFX 230 0 යැවවෙතිලු .
SFX 230 0 යැවවෙන්නෝලු .
SFX 230 0 යැවවෙද්දෙන් .
SFX 230 0 යැවවෙපුවාවේ .
SFX 230 0 යැවවොපුවාවේ .
SFX 230 0 යැවවෙපුදෙන් .
SFX 230 0 යැවවොපුදෙන් .
SFX 230 0 යැවවොවි .
SFX 230 0 යැවවේවි .
SFX 230 0 යැවවුණා .
SFX 230 0 යැවවුණෙමි .
SFX 230 0 යැවවුණෙමු .
SFX 230 0 යැවවුණෙහි .
SFX 230 0 යැවවුණෙහු .
SFX 230 0 යැවවුණේය .
SFX 230 0 යැවවිණ .
SFX 230 0 යැවවිණි .
SFX 230 0 යැවවුණි .
SFX 230 0 යැවවීය . 
SFX 230 0 යැවවුණාය .
SFX 230 0 යැවවුණෝය .
SFX 230 0 යැවවුණහ .
SFX 230 0 යැවවියහ .
SFX 230 0 යැවවුණාලු .
SFX 230 0 යැවවුණේලු .
SFX 230 0 යැවවුණහලු .
SFX 230 0 යැවවුණෝලු .
SFX 230 0 යැවවුණාවේ .
SFX 230 0 යැවවුණදෙන් .
SFX 230 0 යැවවුනා .
SFX 230 0 යැවවුනෙමි .
SFX 230 0 යැවවුනෙමු .
SFX 230 0 යැවවුනෙහි .
SFX 230 0 යැවවුනෙහු .
SFX 230 0 යැවවුනේය .
SFX 230 0 යැවවින .
SFX 230 0 යැවවිනි .
SFX 230 0 යැවවුනි .
SFX 230 0 යැවවුනාය .
SFX 230 0 යැවවුනහ .
SFX 230 0 යැවවුනෝය .
SFX 230 0 යැවවුනාලු .
SFX 230 0 යැවවුනේලු .
SFX 230 0 යැවවුනහලු .
SFX 230 0 යැවවුනෝලු .
SFX 230 0 යැවවුනාවේ .
SFX 230 0 යැවවුනදෙන් .
SFX 230 0 ගියපු .
SFX 230 0 ගොස් .
SFX 230 0 ගිහින් .
SFX 230 0 ගිහිල්ලා .
SFX 230 0 යා .
